Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CITY OF BROOKLYN PARK; SALES TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction of two water mains that will connect from the east to west under marked U.S. Highway 169 to support the city's biotech innovation district in the city of Brooklyn Park are exempt from sales and use tax under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, provided that the materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after November 30, 2025, and before January 1, 2029. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after November 30, 2025, and before January 1, 2029. new text end